Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-195
Rules and regulations.

The risk management and state claims division of the Department of Administrative Services may, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out sections 48-192 to 48-1,109.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 124;

Laws 2000, LB 1221, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB418, § 4.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.